Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1407
Business, defined.

Business shall mean any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, self-employed individual, holding company, joint-stock company, receivership, trust, activity, or entity.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 304.